Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.14 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section:
1. “Electric transmission line” means a high-voltage
transmission line with a rating greater than three hundred (300)
kilovolts; and
2. “Transmission owner” means any person, firm, corporation, or
entity that develops, owns, operates, controls, manages, or
maintains an electric transmission line within this state and is
licensed to do business in this state.
B. A transmission owner shall pay an amount of Two Dollars
($2.00) per linear foot per year of a transmission line that passes
over a landowner’s property.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1929 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY
February 26, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1929 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)